src/pp-udm-lex.txt
! THE UDMURT POSTPOSITION
! SOME OF THEM ARE INDECLINABLE, OTHERS ARE DECLINE IN A VARIOUS NUMBER OF 
! LOCAL CASES.

LEXICON PP ! THESE ARE THE INDECLIEABLE ONES 
+Po: #;

LEXICON PPX ! THESE ARE THE ONES DECLINED FOR CASE
+Po: #; ! NOMINATIVE
+Sg: PPXX ; ! THE REST
+Pl: %>ъёс PPXX ;

LEXICON PPXX ! THE OBLIQUE CASES
+Po+Ine:ын #;
+Po+Ela:ысь #;
+Po+Ill:е #;
+Po+Ill:ы #;
+Po+Pro:тӥ #;
+Po+Egr:ысен #;
+Po+Ter:ось #;
+Po+Apr:лань #;

LEXICON POSTPOSITION
артэ PP ;
бере PP ;
быдэ PP ;
валче PP ;
вамен PP ;
дыръя PP ;
кузя PP ;
ласянь PP ;
пумит PP ;
пумитэ PP ;
пыр PP ;
пыртӥ PP ;
сямен PP ;
сэрен PP ;
ӵоже PP ;
ӵош PP ;
дын PPX ; ! Wинклер
азь PPX ;
борд PPX ;
бӧрсьы PPX ;
вадес:вадеск2 PPX ;
вис:виск2 PPX ;
вӧз PPXX ; ! но номинативе
выл PPX ;
дор PPX ;
дур PPX ;
йыл PPX ;
котыр PPX ;
нал PPX ;
пум PPX ;
пуш:пушк2 PPX ;
пӧл PPX ;
сьӧр PPX ;
ул PPX ;
урдэс PPX ;
шор PPX ;
